Massachusetts, session 194th, S2883.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 32A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 17S the following section:-
Section 17T: (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following
meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise:-
“HIV”, human immunodeficiency virus.
“HIV prevention drug”, any preexposure prophylaxis drug approved for the prevention of
HIV by the federal Food and Drug Administration, including any ancillary or support health
service determined by the secretary of health and human services that is necessary to: (1) ensure
that such a drug is prescribed or administered to a person who is not infected with HIV and has
no medical contraindications to the use of such a drug; and (2) monitor such a person to ensure
the safe and effective ongoing use of such a drug through: (i) an office visit; (ii) laboratory
testing; (iii) testing for a sexually transmitted infection; (iv) medication self-management and
adherence counseling; (v) or any other health service specified as part of comprehensive HIV
of 10

prevention drug services by the United States Department of Health and Human Services, the
United States Centers for Disease Control and Prevention or the United States Preventive
Services Task Force, or an equivalent state-authorized body with responsibility to identify health
services that are components of comprehensive HIV prevention drug services.
(b) The commission shall provide any coverage for an HIV prevention drug to any active
or retired employee of the commonwealth who is insured under the group health insurance
commission: (1) without requiring (i) any cost-sharing, including co-payments or co-insurance,
or any deductible, and (ii) prior authorization, step therapy or any other protocol that could
restrict or delay the dispensing of any HIV prevention drug; and (2) shall not refuse, reject, or
deny a prescription for any covered HIV prevention drug on the basis of the type or category of
health care practitioner issuing the prescription or the venue or practice setting of the health care
practitioner issuing the prescription, as long as the health care practitioner is licensed to prescribe
medications.
SECTION 2. Chapter 118E of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 10Q the following section:-
Section 10R: (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following
meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise:-
“HIV”, human immunodeficiency virus.
“HIV prevention drug”, any preexposure prophylaxis drug approved for the prevention of
HIV by the federal Food and Drug Administration, including any ancillary or support health
service determined by the secretary of health and human services that is necessary to: (1) ensure
that such a drug is prescribed or administered to a person who is not infected with HIV and has
of 10

no medical contraindications to the use of such a drug; and (2) monitor such a person to ensure
the safe and effective ongoing use of such a drug through: (i) an office visit; (ii) laboratory
testing; (iii) testing for a sexually transmitted infection; (iv) medication self-management and
adherence counseling; (v) or any other health service specified as part of comprehensive HIV
prevention drug services by the United States Department of Health and Human Services, the
United States Centers for Disease Control and Prevention or the United States Preventive
Services Task Force, or an equivalent state-authorized body with responsibility to identify health
services that are components of comprehensive HIV prevention drug services.
(b) The division shall provide coverage for any HIV prevention drug: (1) without
requiring (i) any cost-sharing, including co-payments or co-insurance, or any deductible, and (ii)
prior authorization, step therapy or any other protocol that could restrict or delay the dispensing
of any HIV prevention drug; and (2) shall not refuse, reject, or deny a prescription for any
covered HIV prevention drug on the basis of the type or category of health care practitioner
issuing the prescription or the venue or practice setting of the health care practitioner issuing the
prescription, as long as the health care practitioner is licensed to prescribe medications.
SECTION 3. Chapter 127 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 17D the following section:-
Section 17E:- (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following
meanings, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:-
“HIV”, the human immunodeficiency virus.
“HIV Prevention drug,” any preexposure prophylaxis drug approved for the prevention of
HIV by the federal Food and Drug Administration.
of 10

(b) The superintendent of each state correctional facility and the administrator of each
county correctional facility, as defined in section one of Chapter 125, shall ensure that within
reasonable time prior to release each inmate of a state correctional facility, and each inmate of a
country correctional facility who has been committed to a term of 30 days or more, and who is
negative for HIV infection: (1) be provided information and counseling about HIV prevention
drugs to prevent HIV acquisition; (2) with the consent of the inmate, be evaluated for benefit
from an HIV prevention drug; (3) for eligible inmates, and with the consent of the inmate, be
provided with a supply of an HIV prevention drug prior to release. Such supply of an HIV
prevention drug shall at the inmate’s option include the administration immediately prior to
release of the longest duration injectable form of HIV prevention drug, a 90-day supply of an
oral HIV prevention drug, other clinically appropriate HIV prevention drug, or a prescription for
such supply to be filled post-release; and (4) be provided with information about requirements
for medical monitoring after release to ensure the safe and effective ongoing use of such HIV
prevention drug. Each correctional facility shall develop and implement a plan to connect each
inmate receiving an HIV prevention drug pursuant to this paragraph to post-release medical and
other services to ensure ongoing HIV prevention therapy upon return to the community.
(c) Any pre-release supply of an HIV prevention drug shall be provided at no cost to the
inmate.
(d) Each correctional facility evaluating an inmate for an HIV prevention drug pursuant
to paragraph (b) of this section shall ensure that information obtained in such evaluation be kept
confidential between the inmate and medical provider and not shared with security or
administrative staff.
of 10

(e) The Department of Public Health shall promulgate guidance for the implementation
of this section.
SECTION 4. Chapter 175 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 47 UU the following section:-
Section 47VV: (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following
meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise:-
“HIV”, human immunodeficiency virus.
“HIV prevention drug”, any preexposure prophylaxis drug approved for the prevention of
HIV by the federal Food and Drug Administration, including any ancillary or support health
service determined by the secretary of health and human services that is necessary to: (1) ensure
that such a drug is prescribed or administered to a person who is not infected with HIV and has
no medical contraindications to the use of such a drug; and (2) monitor such a person to ensure
the safe and effective ongoing use of such a drug through: (i) an office visit; (ii) laboratory
testing; (iii) testing for a sexually transmitted infection; (iv) medication self-management and
adherence counseling; (v) or any other health service specified as part of comprehensive HIV
prevention drug services by the United States Department of Health and Human Services, the
United States Centers for Disease Control and Prevention or the United States Preventive
Services Task Force, or an equivalent state-authorized body with responsibility to identify health
services that are components of comprehensive HIV prevention drug services.
(b) Any individual policy of accident and sickness insurance issued under section 108
100 that provides hospital expense and surgical expense insurance and any group blanket or general
101 policy of accident and sickness insurance issued under section 110 that provides hospital expense
of 10

102 and surgical expense insurance, which is issued or renewed within or without the
103 commonwealth, and that provides coverage for any HIV prevention drug, shall not (1) require (i)
104 any cost-sharing, including co-payments or co-insurance, or any deductible, and (ii) prior
105 authorization, step therapy or any other protocol that could restrict or delay the dispensing of any
106 HIV prevention drug; or (2) refuse, reject, or deny a prescription for an HIV prevention drug on
107 the basis of the type or category of health care practitioner issuing the prescription or the venue
108 or practice setting of the health care practitioner issuing the prescription, as long as the health
109 care practitioner is licensed to prescribe medications.
110 SECTION 5. Chapter 176A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
111 Section 8VV the following section:-
112 Section 8WW. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following
113 meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise:-
114 “HIV”, human immunodeficiency virus.
115 “HIV prevention drug”, any preexposure prophylaxis drug approved for the prevention of
116 HIV by the federal Food and Drug Administration, including any ancillary or support health
117 service determined by the secretary of health and human services that is necessary to: (1) ensure
118 that such a drug is prescribed or administered to a person who is not infected with HIV and has
119 no medical contraindications to the use of such a drug; and (2) monitor such a person to ensure
120 the safe and effective ongoing use of such a drug through: (i) an office visit; (ii) laboratory
121 testing; (iii) testing for a sexually transmitted infection; (iv) medication self-management and
122 adherence counseling; (v) or any other health service specified as part of comprehensive HIV
123 prevention drug services by the United States Department of Health and Human Services, the
of 10

124 United States Centers for Disease Control and Prevention or the United States Preventive
125 Services Task Force, or an equivalent state-authorized body with responsibility to identify health
126 services that are components of comprehensive HIV prevention drug services.
127 (b) A contract between a subscriber and the corporation under an individual or group
128 hospital service plan which provides hospital expense and surgical expense insurance, except
129 contracts providing supplemental coverage to Medicare or other governmental programs,
130 delivered, issued or renewed by agreement between the insurer and the policyholder, within or
131 without the commonwealth, which provides coverage for any HIV prevention drug shall not: (1)
132 require (i) any cost-sharing, including co-payments or co-insurance, or any deductible, and (ii)
133 prior authorization, step therapy or any other protocol that could restrict or delay the dispensing
134 of any HIV prevention drug; or (2) refuse, reject, or deny a prescription for an HIV prevention
135 drug on the basis of the type or category of health care practitioner issuing the prescription or the
136 venue or practice setting of the health care practitioner issuing the prescription, as long as the
137 health care practitioner is licensed to prescribe medications.
138 SECTION 6. Chapter 176B of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
139 section 4VV the following section:-
140 Section 4WW. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following
141 meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise:-
142 “HIV”, human immunodeficiency virus.
143 “HIV prevention drug”, any preexposure prophylaxis drug approved for the prevention of
144 HIV by the federal Food and Drug Administration, including any ancillary or support health
145 service determined by the secretary of health and human services that is necessary to: (1) ensure
of 10

146 that such a drug is prescribed or administered to a person who is not infected with HIV and has
147 no medical contraindications to the use of such a drug; and (2) monitor such a person to ensure
148 the safe and effective ongoing use of such a drug through: (i) an office visit; (ii) laboratory
149 testing; (iii) testing for a sexually transmitted infection; (iv) medication self-management and
150 adherence counseling; (v) or any other health service specified as part of comprehensive HIV
151 prevention drug services by the United States Department of Health and Human Services, the
152 United States Centers for Disease Control and Prevention or the United States Preventive
153 Services Task Force, or an equivalent state-authorized body with responsibility to identify health
154 services that are components of comprehensive HIV prevention drug services.
155 (b) Any subscription certificate under an individual or group medical service agreement,
156 except certificates that provide supplemental coverage to Medicare or other governmental
157 programs, issued, delivered or renewed within or without the commonwealth that provides
158 coverage for any HIV prevention drug shall not: (1) require (i) any cost-sharing, including co-
159 payments or co-insurance, or any deductible, and (ii) prior authorization, step therapy or any
160 other protocol that could restrict or delay the dispensing of any HIV prevention drug; or (2)
161 refuse, reject, or deny a prescription for an HIV prevention drug on the basis of the type or
162 category of health care practitioner issuing the prescription or the venue or practice setting of the
163 health care practitioner issuing the prescription, as long as the health care practitioner is licensed
164 to prescribe medications.
165 SECTION 7. Chapter 176G of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
166 section 4NN the following section:-
of 10

167 Section 4OO. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following
168 meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise:-
169 “HIV”, human immunodeficiency virus.
170 “HIV prevention drug”, any preexposure prophylaxis drug approved for the prevention of
171 HIV by the federal Food and Drug Administration, including any ancillary or support health
172 service determined by the secretary of health and human services that is necessary to: (1) ensure
173 that such a drug is prescribed or administered to a person who is not infected with HIV and has
174 no medical contraindications to the use of such a drug; and (2) monitor such a person to ensure
175 the safe and effective ongoing use of such a drug through: (i) an office visit; (ii) laboratory
176 testing; (iii) testing for a sexually transmitted infection; (iv) medication self-management and
177 adherence counseling; (v) or any other health service specified as part of comprehensive HIV
178 prevention drug services by the United States Department of Health and Human Services, the
179 United States Centers for Disease Control and Prevention or the United States Preventive
180 Services Task Force, or an equivalent state-authorized body with responsibility to identify health
181 services that are components of comprehensive HIV prevention drug services.
182 (b) A health maintenance contract issued or renewed within or without the
183 commonwealth that provides coverage for any HIV prevention drug shall not: (1) require (i) any
184 cost-sharing, including co-payments or co-insurance, or any deductible, and (ii) prior
185 authorization, step therapy or any other protocol that could restrict or delay the dispensing of any
186 HIV prevention drug, provided, however, that co-payments, coinsurance or deductibles shall be
187 required if the applicable plan is governed by the Federal Internal Revenue Code and would lose
188 its tax-exempt status as a result of the prohibition on co-payments, coinsurance or deductibles for
of 10

189 these services; or (2) refuse, reject, or deny a prescription for an HIV prevention drug on the
190 basis of the type or category of health care practitioner issuing the prescription or the venue or
191 practice setting of the health care practitioner issuing the prescription, as long as the health care
192 practitioner is licensed to prescribe medications.
193 SECTION 8: Section 1 of chapter 94C, as amended by section 108 of chapter 140 of the
194 acts of 2024, is hereby amended by striking out clause (iii) and inserting in place thereof the
195 following clause:- (iii) said pharmacist’s prescription for the treatment and prevention of
196 sexually transmitted infections, including those defined in regulation by the department pursuant
197 to section 121B of chapter 111 or for the prevention of HIV.
of 10